src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
Verb Inflection





































































































































































































































































*-er_verbs examples:*
* *durer:* `durer+V+Inf`
* *dur:* `durer+V+1s+Pres+Ind`
* *durat:* `durer+V+3s+Perf+Ind`
* *dura:* `durer+V+3s+Perf+Ind`
* *durerons:* `durer+V+1p+Fut+Ind`
* *dure:* `durer+V+2s+Pres+Imp`


*-ier_verbs examples:*
* *aidier:* `aidier+V+Inf`
* *aidastes:* `aidier+V+2p+Perf+Ind`
* *aidoit:* `aidier+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind`
* *aideit:* `aidier+V+3s+Ipfv+Ind`
* *aida:* `aidier+V+3s+Perf+Ind`
* *aidat:* `aidier+V+3s+Perf+Ind`
* *aidierons:* `aidier+V+1p+Fut+Ind`
* *aidieront:* `aidier+V+3p+Fut+Ind`
* *aidasse:* `aidier+V+1s+Ipfv+Sbjv`


*-ir_verbs examples:*
* *choisir:* `choisir+V+Inf`
* *choisis:* `choisir+V+1s+Pres+Ind`
* *choisis:* `choisir+V+2s+Pres+Ind`
* *choisis:* `choisir+V+2s+Perf+Ind`
* *choisirez:* `choisir+V+2p+Fut+Ind`
* *choisireiz:* `choisir+V+2p+Fut+Ind`
* *choisiroiz:* `choisir+V+2p+Fut+Ind`
* *choisireie:* `choisir+V+1s+Pres+Cond`
* *choisiroie:* `choisir+V+1s+Pres+Cond`
* *choisist:* `choisir+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv`
* *choisist:* `choisir+V+3s+Pres+Ind`


*-re_verbs examples:*
* *perdre:* `perdre+V+Inf`
* *perds:* `perdre+V+2s+Pres+Ind`
* *perdrons:* `perdre+V+1p+Fut+Ind`
* *perdreie:* `perdre+V+1s+Pres+Cond`
* *perdroie:* `perdre+V+1s+Pres+Cond`
* *perdu:* `perdre+V+Part+Past+Masc+Obl+Sg`
* *perdu:* `perdre+V+Part+Past+Masc+Nom+Pl`
* *perdust:* `perdre+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv`
* *perduxt:* `perdre+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv`
* *perdxt:* `perdre+V+3s+Ipfv+Sbjv`
* *perdu:* `perdre+V+3s+Perf+Ind`
* *perdut:* `perdre+V+3s+Perf+Ind`


*misc_verbs examples:*
* *aveir:* `avoir+V+Inf`
* *avoir:* `avoir+V+Inf`
* *escrivant:* `escrire+V+Part+Pres+Masc+Obl+Sg`
* *escrivant:* `escrire+V+Part+Pres+Masc+Nom+Pl`
* *escrivant:* `escrire+V+Part+Pres+Fem+Nom+Sg`
* *escrivant:* `escrire+V+Part+Pres+Fem+Obl+Sg`
* *escrivans:* `escrire+V+Part+Pres+Fem+Nom+Sg`
* *escrivanz:* `escrire+V+Part+Pres+Fem+Nom+Sg`

* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fro/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
